src/fst/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON 3PlRefl
+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Stress:oi # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress:e # ;
+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress:0 # ;

LEXICON 3PlPoss
+Pro+Poss+3p+Nom+Sg+Unstress:0 # ;
+Pro+Poss+3p+Obl+Sg+Unstress:0 # ;
+Pro+Poss+3p+Nom+Pl+Unstress:0 # ;
+Pro+Poss+3p+Nom+Pl+Unstress:s # ;
+Pro+Poss+3p+Obl+Pl+Unstress:0 # ;
+Pro+Poss+3p+Obl+Pl+Unstress:s # ;

+Pro+Poss+3p+Nom+Sg+Stress:0 # ;
+Pro+Poss+3p+Obl+Sg+Stress:0 # ;
+Pro+Poss+3p+Nom+Pl+Stress:0 # ;
+Pro+Poss+3p+Nom+Pl+Stress:s # ;
+Pro+Poss+3p+Obl+Pl+Stress:0 # ;
+Pro+Poss+3p+Obl+Pl+Stress:s # ;

LEXICON ProAdv
+Pro+Adv:0 # ;
+Pro+Adv:0 # ;

LEXICON Demonstrative
+Pro+Dem+Far+Masc+Nom+Sg:cil # ;
+Pro+Dem+Far+Masc+Nom+Sg:c%{I%} # ;
+Pro+Dem+Far+Masc+Obl+Sg:cel # ;
+Pro+Dem+Far+Masc+Obl+Sg+Stress:cel%>ui # ;
+Pro+Dem+Far+Masc+Nom+Pl:cil # ;
+Pro+Dem+Far+Masc+Nom+Pl:c%{I%} # ;
+Pro+Dem+Far+Masc+Obl+Pl:cels # ;
+Pro+Dem+Far+Masc+Obl+Pl:ceulx # ;
+Pro+Dem+Far+Masc+Obl+Pl:ces # ;
+Pro+Dem+Far+Masc+Obl+Pl:ceos # ; ! Verify

+Pro+Dem+Far+Fem+Nom+Sg:cel%>e # ;
+Pro+Dem+Far+Fem+Obl+Sg:cel%>e # ;
+Pro+Dem+Far+Fem+Obl+Sg+Stress:celi # ;
+Pro+Dem+Far+Fem+Nom+Pl:cel%>es # ;
+Pro+Dem+Far+Fem+Obl+Pl:cel%>es # ;

+Pro+Dem+Near+Masc+Nom+Sg:cist # ;
+Pro+Dem+Near+Masc+Obl+Sg:cest # ;
+Pro+Dem+Near+Masc+Obl+Sg+Stress:cestui # ;
+Pro+Dem+Near+Masc+Nom+Pl:cist # ;
+Pro+Dem+Near+Masc+Obl+Pl:cez # ;

+Pro+Dem+Near+Fem+Nom+Sg:ceste # ;
+Pro+Dem+Near+Fem+Obl+Sg:ceste # ;
+Pro+Dem+Near+Fem+Obl+Sg+Stress:cesti # ;
+Pro+Dem+Near+Fem+Nom+Pl:cestes # ;
+Pro+Dem+Near+Fem+Nom+Pl:cez # ;
+Pro+Dem+Near+Fem+Obl+Pl:cestes # ;
+Pro+Dem+Near+Fem+Obl+Pl:cez # ;

LEXICON DemNeuter
+Pro+Dem+Neut+Nom+Sg+Stress:ço # ;
+Pro+Dem+Neut+Nom+Sg+Stress:ce # ;
+Pro+Dem+Neut+Nom+Sg+Stress:che # ;
+Pro+Dem+Neut+Obl+Sg+Stress:ço # ;
+Pro+Dem+Neut+Obl+Sg+Stress:ce # ;
+Pro+Dem+Neut+Obl+Sg+Stress:che # ;
+Pro+Dem+Neut+Obl+Sg+Stress:ceo # ; ! also unstressed?
+Pro+Dem+Neut+Obl+Sg+Stress:ceu # ; ! also unstressed?
+Pro+Dem+Neut+Nom+Sg+Unstress:ce # ;
+Pro+Dem+Neut+Nom+Sg+Unstress:che # ;
+Pro+Dem+Neut+Obl+Sg+Unstress:ce # ;
+Pro+Dem+Neut+Obl+Sg+Unstress:che # ;
+Pro+Dem+Neut+Nom+Sg+Unstress:c # ;
+Pro+Dem+Neut+Obl+Sg+Unstress:c # ;

+Pro+Dem+Far+Neut+Nom+Sg+Early:cel # ;
+Pro+Dem+Far+Neut+Obl+Sg+Early:cel # ;
+Pro+Dem+Near+Neut+Nom+Sg+Early:cest # ;
+Pro+Dem+Near+Neut+Obl+Sg+Early:cest # ;

LEXICON Relative
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Nom:qui # ;
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Obl+Dir+Unstress:que # ;
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Obl+Dir+Unstress:qe # ;
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Obl+Dir+Stress:quoi # ;
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Obl+Dir+Stress:cui # ;
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Obl+Dir+Stress:coi # ;
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Person+Obl+Indir:cui # ;
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Nom:qui # ;
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Unstress:que # ;
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Stress:quoi # ;
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Stress:cui # ;
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Stress:coi # ;
+Pro+Relative+Neut+Nom:que # ;
+Pro+Relative+Neut+Obl+Dir+Unstress:que # ;
+Pro+Relative+Neut+Obl+Dir+Stress:quoi # ;
+Pro+Relative+Neut+Obl+Dir+Stress:coi # ;
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Place:ou # ;
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Place:où # ;
+Pro+Relative+Gram/Place:u # ;
+Pro+Relative:dont # "of which" ;
+Pro+Relative:dunt # "of which" ;

LEXICON Interrogative
+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom:qui # ;
+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom+Gram/Liason:q # ;
+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Nom:chi # ;
+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Obl+Dir+Stress:quoi # ;
+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Obl+Dir+Stress:cui # ;
+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Obl+Dir+Stress:coi # ;
+Pro+Interr+Gram/Person+Obl+Indir:cui # ;
+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom:qui # ;
+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom+Gram/Liason:q # ;
+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Nom:chi # ;
+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Unstress:que # ;
+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Stress:quoi # ;
+Pro+Interr+Gram/Thing+Obl+Dir+Stress:coi # ;
+Pro+Interr+Neut+Nom:que # ;
+Pro+Interr+Neut+Nom:quoi # ;
+Pro+Interr+Neut+Nom:coi # ;
+Pro+Interr+Neut+Obl+Dir+Unstress:que # ;
+Pro+Interr+Neut+Obl+Dir+Stress:quoi # ;
+Pro+Interr+Neut+Obl+Dir+Stress:coi # ;

LEXICON Quel ! Rework this
+Relative+Masc+Sg:quel # ;
+Relative+Masc+Pl:quels # ;
+Relative+Fem+Sg:quel%>e # ;
+Relative+Fem+Pl:quel%>es # ;
+Interr+Masc+Sg:quel # ;
+Interr+Masc+Pl:quels # ;
+Interr+Fem+Sg:quel%>e # ;
+Interr+Fem+Pl:quel%>es # ;

LEXICON Lequel ! Rework this
+Relative+Masc+Sg:lequel # ;
+Relative+Masc+Pl:lesquels # ;
+Relative+Masc+Pl:lesqueulx # ;
+Relative+Masc+Pl:lesquelx # ;
+Relative+Fem+Sg:laquel%>e # ;
+Relative+Fem+Pl:lesquel%>es # ;
+Interr+Masc+Sg:lequel # ;
+Interr+Masc+Pl:lesquels # ;
+Interr+Masc+Pl:lesqueulx # ;
+Interr+Fem+Sg:laquel%>e # ;
+Interr+Fem+Pl:lesquel%>es # ;

LEXICON IndefPro
+Pro+Adj+Indef+Nom+Sg:s # ;
+Pro+Adj+Indef+Obl+Sg:0 # ;
+Pro+Adj+Indef+Nom+Pl:0 # ;
+Pro+Adj+Indef+Obl+Pl:s # ;

!!€gt-norm: Pro+Prs
!!€ mi:         je+Pro+Poss+1s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress
!!€ my:         je+Pro+Poss+1s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress
!!€ mei:        je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Stress
!!€ mey:        je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Stress
!!€ moi:        je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Stress
!!€ moy:        je+Pro+Prs+1s+Obl+Stress
!!€ nos:        nous+Pro+Prs+1p+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early
!!€ nous:       nous+Pro+Prs+1p+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early
!!€ noux:       nous+Pro+Prs+1p+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early
!!€ nox:       nous+Pro+Prs+1p+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early
!!€ els:       ils+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Obl+Dir+Stress
!!€ eus:       ils+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Obl+Dir+Stress
!!€ euls:       ils+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Obl+Dir+Stress
!!€ eulx:       ils+Pro+Prs+3p+Masc+Obl+Dir+Stress
!!€ soi:        se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Stress
!!€ soy:        se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Stress
!!€ en:         en+Pro+Adv
!!€ an:         en+Pro+Adv
!!€ i:          i+Pro+Adv
!!€ y:          i+Pro+Adv
!!€ ton:        tu+Pro+Poss+2s+Masc+Obl+Sg+Unstress
!!€ tun:        tu+Pro+Poss+2s+Masc+Obl+Sg+Unstress
!!€ suens:      son+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress
!!€ soens:      son+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress
!!€ seuns:      son+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress
!!€ siens:      son+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress
!!€ sions:      son+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress
!!€ sians:      son+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress
!!€ suans:      son+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Obl+Pl+Stress
!!€ suens:      son+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Stress
!!€ soens:      son+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Stress
!!€ seuns:      son+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Stress
!!€ suans:      son+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Stress
!!€ siens:      son+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Stress
!!€ sions:      son+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Stress
!!€ sians:      son+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Sg+Stress
!!€ icestui:    icel+Pro+Dem+Near+Masc+Obl+Sg+Stress
!!€ icestuy:    icel+Pro+Dem+Near+Masc+Obl+Sg+Stress
!!€ ycestui:    icel+Pro+Dem+Near+Masc+Obl+Sg+Stress
!!€ ycestuy:    icel+Pro+Dem+Near+Masc+Obl+Sg+Stress
