src/fst/stems/pronouns.lexc
se:s 3PlRefl "themselves" ;
i ProAdv "a+Pron" ;
y ProAdv "a+Pron" ;
en ProAdv "de+Pron" ;
em ProAdv "de+Pron" ;
lor 3PlPoss "their" ;
lur 3PlPoss "their" ;
leur 3PlPoss "their" ;
icel:%{I%} Demonstrative ;
cel: Demonstrative ;
ice:%{I%} DemNeuter ;
ce: DemNeuter ;
quoi: Interrogative ;
que: Relative ;
lequel+Pro: Lequel ;
quel+Pro: Quel ;
chascun IndefPro "each one, everyone" ;
personne IndefPro "someone, no one" ;
plusor IndefPro "several, many" ;
maint IndefPro "many" ;
nïent:nïen%{T%} IndefPro "nothing" ;
